Utah statutes.
32A-3-107.   Delivery of liquor to package agencies.
(1)  Liquor to be sold from a package agency may be lawfully transported from
any warehouse or state store authorized by the department to the package
agency.  Transportation may be done by any common carrier or other person
authorized by the department to transport the liquor to the package agency.
(2)  A common carrier or other person, while in or about any vehicle in which
liquor is being transported, may not open, break, or allow to be opened or
broken, any package containing liquor.   A person may not drink, use, or allow
to be drunk or used, any liquor while it is in transit under this section.
